Utah statutes.
78B-13-315.   Role of prosecutor or attorney general.
(1)  In a case arising under this chapter or involving the Hague Convention on
the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, the prosecutor or Attorney
General may take any lawful action, including resort to a proceeding under
this chapter or any other available civil proceeding to locate a child, obtain
the return of a child, or enforce a child custody determination if there is:
(a)  an existing child custody determination;
(b)  a request from a court in a pending child custody case;
(c)  a reasonable belief that a criminal statute has been violated; or
(d)  a reasonable belief that the child has been wrongfully removed or
retained in violation of the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of
International Child Abduction.
(2)  A prosecutor or attorney general acts on behalf of the court and may not
represent any party to a child custody determination.
